Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 5. Death, Withdrawal, or Disqualification of Party Nominee.

§ 24.2-539.
Party may nominate when nominee dies, withdraws, or nomination is set aside; duty of party chairman.

Should the nominee of any party die, withdraw, or have his nomination set aside for any reason, the party may nominate to fill the vacancy in accordance with its own rules.
A candidate who has been disqualified for failing to meet the filing requirements of Article 1 (§

24.2-500

et seq.) of this chapter shall not be renominated. No party shall renominate any person whose nomination has been set aside for fraud knowingly participated in by the candidate.
The party chairman or chairmen shall promptly certify the name of any such nominee to the appropriate electoral boards and the nominee shall promptly comply with the filing requirements of Article 1 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-234, 24-235, 24-365; 1952, c. 4; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-110, 24.1-197; 1976, c. 616; 1980, c. 639; 1984, c. 480; 1990, c. 476; 1992, c. 828; 1993, c. 641.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 129; 6B M.J. Elections, § 41.

§ 24.2-540.
Other parties may also nominate; independent candidates.

Any other political party may also nominate and file the required notice of a new candidate pursuant to §

24.2-539

if the candidate who died, withdrew, or had his nomination set aside was unopposed by that party.
A nonparty candidate shall also be permitted to file a notice of candidacy whether or not the candidate who died, withdrew, or had his nomination set aside was opposed by a nonparty or party candidate.

Any such party or nonparty candidate shall file any statement or petition required of him by Article 1 (§

24.2-500

et seq.) or Article 2 (§

24.2-505

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-234, 24-235; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-110; 1976, c. 616; 1980, c. 639; 1984, c. 480; 1990, c. 476; 1992, c. 828; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-541.
Printing of names on ballot.

In the case (i) of a candidate who has died if the notice is filed with the proper official at least 25 days before the day on which the election is to be held or (ii) of a candidate who has withdrawn or had his nomination set aside if the notice is filed with the proper official at least 60 days before the day on which the election is to be held, the electoral board or boards having charge of the printing of the ballots for such election shall either:

Cause to be printed thereon the name of every person qualifying as provided in this article; or

If ballots for the election have already been printed, cause separate ballots to be printed for the office on which shall be printed the name of every person qualifying as provided in this article and of any other party or nonparty candidate for the same office who had already qualified to have his name printed on the ballot. In addition, the electoral board may cause to be stricken from the earlier printed ballots the title of the office involved and the names of all candidates for that office appearing thereon.If the candidate so dying, withdrawing or having his nomination set aside is a candidate for an office to which more than one person is to be elected and none of the candidates was opposed prior to such death, withdrawal, or setting aside, then the ballots shall be so printed as to permit the electors to vote separately for the remaining unopposed candidate or candidates, and for such persons who filed notice of candidacy as provided in this article.Whenever any additional candidate qualifies as provided in this article, no votes previously cast by absentee ballot for a candidate for such office shall be counted, but any person who has so voted shall be entitled to receive a new ballot and to vote for his choice among all the candidates for such office.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-234, 24-235; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-110; 1976, c. 616; 1980, c. 639; 1984, c. 480; 1990, c. 476; 1992, c. 828; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 476.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 476 in the first paragraph, substituted “25” for “twenty-five,” and “60” for “forty-five.”